Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 5
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS - IMPLEMENTATION OF COMMISSION PLAN

Editor's note:

Sections 6 through 14 of chapter 286, Session Laws of Colorado 2000, provided for the organization of the 2000 reapportionment commission.

2-2-501. Number of members of general assembly - election from districts.

The senate of the general assembly shall consist of thirty-five members and the house of representatives thereof shall consist of sixty-five members, with one member of the senate to be elected from each senatorial district and one member of the house of representatives to be elected from each representative district, as established in this part 5.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 332, § 1, effective June 19.

2-2-502. Definitions.

As used in this part 5:

"Legislative commission" means the independent legislative redistricting commission, created pursuant to section 46 of article V of the state constitution.

"Major political party" means one of the two largest political parties as determined by the number of registered electors with each political party according to voter registration data published by the secretary of state for the earliest day in January of the year in which members of the independent congressional redistricting commission are appointed.

"Voting Rights Act of 1965" means the federal statute, codified at 52 U.S.C. sec. 10301 et seq., as referred to in the ballot measure adopted by voters in 2018 to add section 48.1 (1)(b) to article V of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 332, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1385, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1210), ch. 352, p. 1634, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1324, § 3, effective July 11.

2-2-503. Designation of senatorial districts to elect in years ending in 2 and 4.

As a part of its preliminary and final redistricting plans for state senatorial districts, the legislative commission shall designate those senatorial districts in which state senators are elected at the general election to be held in November of the next year ending in 2, and every four years thereafter, and those senatorial districts in which state senators are elected at the general election to be held in November of the next year ending in 4, and every four years thereafter. Such designation of senatorial districts must be filed with the secretary of state as a part of the approved redistricting plan required to be filed by section 48.3 (5) of article V of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 332, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 323, § 1, effective June 9.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1385, § 2, effective May 30.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1210), ch. 352, p. 1634, § 2, effective August 11.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1325, § 3, effective July 11.

2-2-504. Holdover senators keep office - vacancies.

Nothing in this part 5 or in any redistricting plan removes any senator from his or her office for the term for which the senator was elected, and each such senator shall serve the term for which he or she was elected.

If any senator elected at a general election in a year ending in 0 vacates his or her seat prior to the convening of the regular legislative session in the next year ending in 3, such vacancy must be filled from the district from which the senator was elected in accordance with section 1-12-203. If such vacancy occurs more than fifty-five days before the general election in the next year ending in 2, there must be an election at the general election in that year ending in 2 for the remainder of such senator's term from the senatorial district created by the legislative commission. Nomination of candidates at such election must be in accordance with article 4 of title 1.

If any senator elected at a general election in a year ending in 0 vacates his or her seat on or after the convening of the regular legislative session in the next year ending in 3, such vacancy must be filled from the senatorial district created by the legislative commission in accordance with section 1-12-203.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 333, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 323, § 2, effective June 9.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1385, § 3, effective May 30.

L. 2010:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 10-1210), ch. 352, p. 1634, § 3, effective August 11.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1325, § 3, effective July 11.

2-2-505. Maps of legislative districts.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2020.)

At the time of submission of a final redistricting plan to the Colorado supreme court for its review and determination in accordance with section 48.3 of article V of the state constitution, the legislative commission shall provide the supreme court with a copy of all maps showing the division of the state into legislative districts and necessary supportive evidence, pursuant to the supreme court rules adopted for such proceedings.

As soon as possible after approval of a final plan by the Colorado supreme court, the legislative commission shall prepare and file with the secretary of state copies of census maps showing thereon each legislative district and a description of each district in terms of official census units. The legislative commission shall also file with the county clerk and recorder in each county the necessary maps and descriptions of each legislative district located within the boundaries of such county.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 333, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1325, § 3, effective July 11.

2-2-505.5. Presidential election years. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1210), ch. 352, p. 1635, § 4, effective August 11.

L. 2020:

Entire section repealed, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1326, § 3, effective July 11.

2-2-506. Precinct boundaries.

Pursuant to the provisions of sections

1-5-101

and

1-5-102

, the clerk and recorder of each county, subject to the approval of its board of county commissioners, shall redraw the general election precincts in such county to ensure that no general election precinct is contained within more than one state representative, state senatorial, or congressional district.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 1623, § 9, effective May 31, 1994.)

Not more than one week after such approval of precinct boundaries and in accordance with sections

1-5-101

and

1-5-102

, C.R.S., the board of county commissioners shall file with the secretary of state a copy of the county precinct boundary map showing thereon the revised and reestablished general election precinct boundaries and the boundaries of any legislative or congressional district, if said county is divided into two or more state representative, state senatorial, or congressional districts.

The board of county commissioners shall notify the county chairman of each of the two major political parties of any general election precinct boundaries revised and reestablished in accordance with the provisions of this section within five days after the establishment of precinct boundaries in accordance with the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 333, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 90:

(1) amended, p. 324, § 3, effective June 9.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 590, § 1, effective April 10.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1623, § 9, effective May 31.

L. 2020:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1326, § 3, effective July 11.

2-2-507. Attachments and detachments.

If any area of the state is omitted from the redistricting plan approved by the Colorado supreme court, inadvertently or by virtue of the complexities of the census materials used in the development of the plan, the secretary of state, upon discovery of such omission, shall determine to which senatorial or representative district the area should be assigned as follows:

If the area is surrounded by a representative or senatorial district, the area shall be assigned to said district; and

If the area is contiguous to two or more representative or senatorial districts, the area shall be assigned to the district that has the least population according to the latest national census.

If any area of the state is included in two or more senatorial or representative districts in the redistricting plan approved by the Colorado supreme court, inadvertently or by virtue of the complexities of the census materials used in the development of the plan, the secretary of state, upon discovery of such inclusion, shall detach said area from the senatorial or representative district or districts having the largest population and shall designate such area as being assigned to the district having the least population; except that, if such area is wholly surrounded by a senatorial or representative district and inadvertently is also included in another district, the secretary of state shall assign such area to the district wholly surrounding such area, regardless of population.

(2.5) (a) If a county clerk and recorder discovers that a border between two senatorial or representative districts divides a residential parcel between the two districts and the clerk and recorder wishes to have the border moved, the clerk and recorder shall submit to the secretary of state documentation, satisfactory to the secretary of state, evidencing such division. If the secretary of state believes that the border should be moved, the secretary of state shall propose moving the border between the two districts to a visible feature normally relied upon by the United States census bureau such that the border:

Does not split a residential parcel;

Moves the remaining portion of the residential parcel into the least populated of the two districts; except that, if the border is a border between both senatorial and representative districts, the remaining portion of the residential parcel shall be moved into the least populated of the two representative districts;

Would not result in a violation of section 48.1 (1)(a) of article V of the state constitution based upon the latest national census;

Minimizes the impact on the affected community for purposes of establishing polling locations; and

Minimizes changes in distances from the redistricting plan approved by the Colorado supreme court.

If the secretary of state proposes moving any border pursuant to this subsection (2.5), the secretary of state shall describe any potential changes in populations of affected senatorial or representative districts, based on the latest national census, to the Colorado supreme court. If the supreme court determines that the assignments made by the secretary of state satisfy the criteria established in subsection (2.5)(a) of this section, the supreme court may approve said assignments. If the supreme court determines that the assignment does not satisfy the criteria established in subsection (2.5)(a) of this section, the supreme court shall deny the proposed assignment.

Following the assignment of any area pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the secretary of state shall certify the population of such assigned area and any changes in populations of affected senatorial or representative districts, based on the latest national census, to the Colorado supreme court. If the supreme court determines that the assignments made by the secretary of state would not result in a violation of the population requirements of section 48.1 of article V of the state constitution, the supreme court shall approve said assignments. If the supreme court determines that the assignments would result in a violation of the population requirements of section 48.1 of article V of the state constitution, the supreme court shall certify a revised reapportionment plan to the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 334, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 2002:

(2.5) added, p. 417, § 2, effective May 6.

L. 2013:

(2.5)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 750, § 128, effective May 10.

L. 2020:

IP(1), (2), (2.5)(a)(III), (2.5)(a)(V), (2.5)(b), and (3) amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1326, § 3, effective July 11.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting subsection (2.5), see section 1 of chapter 142, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

(2) In 2013, subsection (2.5)(a)(IV) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

2-2-508. Changes in county and municipal boundaries.

Whenever the boundaries of a senatorial or representative district coincide with the boundaries of a county or municipality, and said county or municipal boundaries are changed by annexation or detachment, the boundaries of the senatorial or representative district shall remain the same until such time as a new redistricting is made following a national census as provided in sections 46 to 48.4 of article V of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 334, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1328, § 3, effective July 11.

2-2-509. Published plan and records.

Upon submission of the redistricting plan approved by the Colorado supreme court to the secretary of state, the legislative commission shall provide copies of the published plan to the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall provide any candidate for legislative office or any Colorado citizen with a copy of a map showing the boundaries for any legislative district upon request. Individual district maps must be provided to any resident of a legislative district without charge. A nominal charge, not to exceed the actual cost, may be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3) for copies of district maps for which an individual is not a resident.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 335, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 864, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1328, § 3, effective July 11.

2-2-510. Commission meetings - open to public. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 335, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 2020:

Entire section repealed, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1328, § 3, effective July 11.

2-2-511. Applicability.

This part 5 applies to the legislative commission appointed in years ending in 1 and to state senatorial and state representative districts created by said commission.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 335, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 90:

Entire part amended, p. 324, § 4, effective June 9.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1386, § 5, effective May 30.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1210), ch. 352, p. 1635, § 5, effective August 11.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-186), ch. 272, p. 1328, § 3, effective July 11.